dev/apertium-swe.pre-saldo-swe.dix
<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="is">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <!-- Make nicer-->
  <e>              <re>[IVXM]+</re><p><l>:s</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>


  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>DKK</l><r><b/>DKK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>EUR</l><r><b/>EUR<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kr</l><r><b/>kr<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>NOK</l><r><b/>NOK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>riksdaler</l><r><b/>riksdaler<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>SEK</l><r><b/>SEK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>tkr</l><r><b/>tkr<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>USD</l><r><b/>USD<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>ton</l><r><b/>ton<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kg</l><r><b/>kg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>hg</l><r><b/>hg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>g</l><r><b/>g<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>mg</l><r><b/>mg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km</l><r><b/>km<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>m</l><r><b/>m<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>dm</l><r><b/>dm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>cm</l><r><b/>cm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>mm</l><r><b/>mm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>har</l><r><b/>har<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>ar</l><r><b/>ar<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kvm</l><r><b/>kvm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kvcm</l><r><b/>kvcm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MB</l><r><b/>MB<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kB</l><r><b/>kB<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>Mb</l><r><b/>Mb<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kb</l><r><b/>kb<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MHz</l><r><b/>MHz<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kV</l><r><b/>kV<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kW</l><r><b/>kW<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kWh</l><r><b/>kWh<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MW</l><r><b/>MW<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>hk</l><r><b/>hk<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kcal</l><r><b/>kcal<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km/h</l><r><b/>km/h<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kp</l><r><b/>kp<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>m/s</l><r><b/>m/s<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>N</l><r><b/>N<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>N</l><r><b/>Nm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>krm</l><r><b/>krm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>msk</l><r><b/>msk/h<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>tsk</l><r><b/>tsk<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Suffixes -->
<pardef n="S__case">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e c="typo" r="LR"><p><l>'s</l>          <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Ø__case" c="for nouns ending in -s">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'</l>          <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e c="typo" r="LR"><p><l>'s</l>          <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n=":-__case" c="for nouns with genitive of -:">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>          <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>          <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e c="typo" r="LR"><p><l>'s</l>          <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Determiners -->

<pardef n="e/n__det">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/en__det">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="varje__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mång/a__det">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>a<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>a<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="flera__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="flest__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="första__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sådan__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="de/nna__det">
  <e>       <p><l>nna</l>       <r>nna<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tta</l>       <r>nna<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssa</l>       <r>nna<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="någ/on__det">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>on<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ra</l>        <r>on<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="många">           <i>mång</i><par n="mång/a__det"/></e>
<e lm="flera">           <i>flera</i><par n="flera__det"/></e>
<e lm="flest">           <i>flest</i><par n="flest__det"/></e>
<e lm="en">              <i>e</i><par n="e/n__det"/></e>
<e lm="den">             <i>d</i><par n="d/en__det"/></e>
<e lm="denna">           <i>de</i><par n="de/nna__det"/></e>
<e lm="sådan">           <i>sådan</i><par n="sådan__det"/></e>
<e lm="varje">           <i>varje</i><par n="varje__det"/></e>
<e lm="någon">           <i>någ</i><par n="någ/on__det"/></e>
<e lm="många" a="is">           <i>mång</i><par n="mång/a__det"/></e>
<e lm="flera" a="is">           <i>flera</i><par n="flera__det"/></e>
<e lm="flest" a="is">           <i>flest</i><par n="flest__det"/></e>
<e lm="första">          <i>första</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="andra">           <i>andra</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="tredje">          <i>tredje</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="fjärde">          <i>fjärde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="femte">           <i>femte</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="sjätte">          <i>sjätte</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="sjunde">          <i>sjunde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="åttonde">         <i>åttonde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="nionde">          <i>nionde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="tionde" a="is">   <i>tionde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="elfte" a="is">    <i>elfte</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="tolfte" a="is">   <i>tolfte</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="trettonde" a="is"><i>trettonde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="fjortonde" a="is"><i>fjortonde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="femtonde" a="is"> <i>femtonde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="sextonde" a="is"> <i>sextonde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="sjuttonde" a="is"><i>sjuttonde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="artonde" a="is">  <i>artonde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="nittonde" a="is"> <i>nittonde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="tjugonde" a="is"> <i>tjugonde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="trettionde" a="is"><i>trettionde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="fyrtionde" a="is"><i>fyrtionde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="femtionde" a="is"><i>femtionde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="sextionde" a="is"><i>sextionde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="sjuttionde" a="is"><i>sjuttionde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="åttionde" a="is"> <i>åttionde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="nittionde" a="is"><i>nittionde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="hundrade" a="is"> <i>hundrade</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="tusende" a="is">  <i>tusende</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="tiotusende" a="PT">  <i>tusende</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="hundratusende" a="PT">  <i>tusende</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
